Massachusetts, session 194th, S1492.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Every Massachusetts hospital, through its maternity program, shall provide the parent or
parents or the legal guardian of a newborn infant with written informational materials containing
the American Academy of Pediatrics’ recommendations concerning safe sleep practices at the
time of such infant’s discharge from the hospital.
of 1